New Jersey, session 222, S4039.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  For the purposes of this section: Business entity means any natural or legal person, business corporation, professional services corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, business trust, association, or any other legal commercial entity organized under the laws of this State or any other state or foreign jurisdiction. Personal flotation device means a wearable device, including but not limited to a lifejacket, puddle jumper, water wings, or other flotation device designed for recreational swimming and to be worn or attached to the body of a person who is less than 12 years of age. b.    It shall be unlawful for any business entity to sell, distribute, manufacturer, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in this State a personal flotation device that is not approved by the United States Coast Guard.  Any business entity that violates this provision shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $100 for a first offense, $250 for a second offense, and $500 for a third or subsequent offense, which may be collected and enforced by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety in a summary proceeding pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  The Superior Court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings for the enforcement of the penalty provided by this section. c.     In accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs may promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month following enactment.